Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB421.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Protect Workers from Training Repayment Agreement Provisions Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Employee." An individual employed by an employer."Employer." As follows:(1) As defined in section 3(g) of the act of January 17, 1234567891011121314151617 1968 (P.L.11, No.5), known as The Minimum Wage Act of 1968.(2) The term does not include a governmental or quasi-governmental body."Training repayment agreement." As follows:(1) An agreement requiring an employee to pay an employer, or a training provider or other third party, a sum of money if the employee voluntarily or involuntarily leaves employment with the employer, including an agreement requiring the employee to reimburse the employer, training provider or other third party for training previously provided to the employee.(2) The term does not include a cash advance to an employee, a payment for equipment sold or leased to an employee, an educational sabbatical leave contract or a training repayment agreement entered into as part of a collective bargaining agreement.Section 3. Training repayment agreement.(a) Prohibition.--An employer may not require, as a condition of employment, an employee or prospective employee to enter into a training repayment agreement.(b) Effect.--A training repayment agreement involving an employee is void, and the employee shall not be obligated to make any payment under the training repayment agreement.Section 4. Enforcement.The department shall enforce this act and may conduct investigations as it deems necessary for enforcement.Section 5. Penalties.(a) Civil penalty for violation.--An employer found to be in violation of any provision of this act is subject to a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for each violation.20250HB0421PN0395 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Subsequent violation.--For each subsequent violation of any provision of this act, an employer is subject to an additional civil penalty of $25,000 per employee.Section 6. Applicability.This act shall apply to a training repayment agreement entered into on or after the effective date of this section.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0421PN0395 - 3 - 12345678